West Virginia, session 2025, SB731.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Repeal of article creating the Design Build Procurement Act. That §5-22A-1, §5-22A-2, §5-22A-3, §5-22A-4, §5-22A-5, §5-22A-6, §5-22A-7, §5-22A-8, §5-22A-9, §5-22A-10, §5-22A-11, §5-22A-12, §5-22A-13, §5-22A-14, §5-22A-15, and §5-22A-16 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed.